Arkansas statutes. Title 8 Environmental Law
Chapter 7 Hazardous Substances
8-7-227. Corrective action at permitted facilities and interim status facilities.

Any permit issued under this subchapter for any hazardous waste treatment, storage, or disposal facility shall require corrective action for all releases of hazardous waste or constituents from any solid waste management unit at the hazardous waste treatment, storage, or disposal facility seeking the permit under this subchapter regardless of the time at which waste was placed in the unit.

The corrective action component of the permit shall contain:

Schedules of compliance for the corrective action when the corrective action cannot be completed prior to issuance of the permit; and

Assurances of financial responsibility for completing the corrective action.

The corrective action component of the permit shall also require that corrective action be taken beyond the hazardous waste treatment, storage, or disposal facility boundary when necessary to protect human health and the environment unless the owner or operator of the hazardous waste treatment, storage, or disposal facility concerned demonstrates to the satisfaction of the Director of the Division of Environmental Quality that, despite the owner's or operator's best efforts, the owner or operator was unable to obtain the necessary permission to undertake the action.

Whenever the director determines that there is or has been a release of hazardous waste into the environment from a facility authorized to operate under interim operating authority pursuant to this subchapter, the director may:

Issue an order requiring corrective action or such other response measure as the director deems necessary to protect human health or the environment; or

Commence a civil action in the circuit court in the county in which the facility is located for appropriate relief, including a temporary or permanent injunction.

Any order issued under this subsection:

Shall state with reasonable specificity the nature of the required corrective action or other response measure;

Shall specify a time for compliance; and

May include a suspension or revocation of the interim authority to operate under this subchapter.

If any person named in an order issued under this section fails to comply with the order, the director may assess a civil penalty in an amount not to exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) for each day of noncompliance with the order.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1166, § 1; 2019, No. 910, § 2743.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (a)(3).

Subchapter 3
— Arkansas Resource Reclamation Act of 1979

Effective Dates.

Acts 1985, No. 922, § 7: Apr. 15, 1985. Emergency clause provided: “It has been found and it is hereby declared by the General Assembly that inequalities now exist in the regulation of hazardous waste management in this state as a result of current provisions of Act 1098 of 1979 (§ 8-7-301 et seq.), and that said provisions jeopardize the federal delegation of authority necessary to operate a state hazardous waste management program in lieu of a federal program, thereby threatening the orderly development of the state's resources in a manner which will protect the health and welfare of the people of the State of Arkansas. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act, being necessary for the preservation of the public health, safety and welfare, shall take effect and be in force from the date of its approval.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

8-7-301. Title.

This subchapter may be cited as the “Arkansas Resource Reclamation Act of 1979”.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 1098, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-4217.

8-7-302. Legislative findings.

The General Assembly finds and it is declared that:

The disposal of hazardous waste, although currently necessary for certain forms of hazardous waste, represents an inefficient use of natural resources and may present long-term threats to the environment and to the public health and safety;

Technically and economically feasible treatment methods are becoming increasingly available and offer the advantages of complete destruction of hazardous waste or the recovery and reclamation of some, if not all, constituents of hazardous waste;

In addition to the recovery or reclamation of natural resources, treatment of hazardous waste reduces the volume of hazardous waste which must be disposed of and thereby reduces the associated threats to the environment and to the public health and safety;

Interstate cooperation is necessary to assure that the volume of hazardous waste which must be disposed of within the state is reduced through a comprehensive program which encourages and, when appropriate, requires the treatment of hazardous waste; and

The Arkansas Hazardous Waste Management Act of 1979, § 8-7-201 et seq., authorizes the Division of Environmental Quality to encourage the development of interstate agreements for the management of hazardous waste and to enter into such interstate agreements, with the concurrence of the Governor.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 1098, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-4218; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 2744.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (5).

8-7-303. Policy and purpose.

The General Assembly declares that it is the policy of this state and the purpose of this subchapter to:

Establish a statewide program designed to protect society and the environment from the risks and burdens associated with the continued practice of disposing of those forms of hazardous waste which could otherwise be treated;

Encourage the development and utilization of techniques which result in the recovery, reclamation, and conservation of resources of the state, including the reclamation and conservation or safeguarding of abandoned hazardous waste disposal sites;

Encourage interstate cooperation and interstate agreements which would provide a requisite balance of disposal and treatment facilities among the states and which would reduce the amount of hazardous waste disposed of in the state, irrespective of the origin of the hazardous waste; and

Coordinate the administration of this subchapter with the administration of the Arkansas Hazardous Waste Management Act of 1979, § 8-7-201 et seq., so as to further the purposes of both this subchapter and the Arkansas Hazardous Waste Management Act of 1979, § 8-7-201 et seq.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 1098, § 3; 1985, No. 922, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-4219.

8-7-304. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Commission” means the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission;

[Repealed.]

[Repealed.]

“Disposal” means the discharge, deposit, injection, dumping, spilling, leaking, or placing of any hazardous waste into or on any land or water in whatever manner so that the hazardous waste or any constituent thereof might or might not enter the environment or be emitted into the air or discharged into any water, including groundwaters;

“Facility” means any land and appurtenances thereon and thereto used for the treatment, storage, or disposal of hazardous waste;

“Generation” means the act or process of producing waste materials;

“Hazardous waste” means any waste or combination of wastes of a solid, liquid, contained gaseous, or semisolid form which, because of its quantity, concentration, or physical, chemical, or infectious characteristics may, in the judgment of the Division of Environmental Quality:

Cause or significantly contribute to an increase in mortality or an increase in serious irreversible or incapacitating reversible illness; or

Pose a substantial present or potential hazard to human health or the environment when improperly treated, stored, transported, or disposed of or otherwise improperly managed.

“Hazardous waste” includes, but is not limited to, those which are radioactive, toxic, corrosive, flammable, irritants, strong sensitizers, or which generate pressure through decomposition, heat, or other means;

“Hazardous waste management” means the systematic control of the generation, collection, source separation, storage, transportation, processing, recovery, disposal, and treatment of hazardous waste;

“Manifest” means the form used for identifying the quantity and composition and the origin, routing, and destination of hazardous waste during its transport;

“Owners, operators, or other responsible parties” means and includes:

Any person owning or operating a site or facility; or

In the case of any inactive or abandoned facility or site, any person who owned, operated, or otherwise controlled the activities at the site or facility during the time that the site or facility was used to manage hazardous wastes;

“Person” means any individual, corporation, company, firm, partnership, association, trust, joint-stock company, state agency, government instrumentality or agency, institution, county, city, town, or municipal authority or trust, venture, or any other legal entity, however organized;

“Site” means any real property located within the boundaries of the State of Arkansas contemplated or later acquired for the purpose of, but not limited to, landfills or other facilities to be used for treatment, storage, disposal, or generation of hazardous waste;

“Storage” means the containment of hazardous waste, either on a temporary basis or for a period of years, in such a manner as not to constitute disposal of such hazardous waste.

However, storage by means of burial shall be deemed to constitute disposal within the meaning of this subchapter;

“Transport” means the movement of wastes from the point of generation to any intermediate points and finally to the point of ultimate storage or disposal;

“Treatment” means any method, technique, or process, including neutralization, designed to change the physical, chemical, or biological character or composition of any hazardous waste so as to neutralize such hazardous waste or so as to render such hazardous waste less hazardous, safer for transport, amenable to recovery, amenable to storage, amenable to disposal, or reduced in volume; and

“Treatment facility” means a location at which waste is subjected to treatment and may include a facility where waste has been generated.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 1098, § 4; 1985, No. 922, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-4220; Acts 1999, No. 1164, § 94; 2019, No. 910, §§ 2745, 2746.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment repealed (2) and (3); and substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “department” in the introductory language of (7)(A).

8-7-305. Exception to provisions.

This subchapter does not apply to an industrial waste treatment facility that discharges into a publicly owned treatment works if the industrial waste treatment facility and publicly owned treatment works comply with the Arkansas Water and Air Pollution Control Act, § 8-4-101 et seq.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 1098, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-4224.

8-7-306. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning penalties, was repealed by Acts 2015, No. 1264, § 7. The section was derived from Acts 1979, No. 1098, § 7; 1985, No. 922, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-4223.

8-7-307. Unlawful actions — Acts or omissions of third parties.

It is unlawful for a person to:

Violate a provision of this subchapter or of any rule, permit, or order issued under this subchapter;

Transport hazardous waste into or out of the state, except as provided by rule established by the Division of Environmental Quality pursuant to the provisions of this subchapter; or

Dispose of hazardous waste in the state except as provided by rules established by the division pursuant to this subchapter.

A person who violates this section upon conviction is guilty of an unclassified misdemeanor and shall be sentenced to not more than one (1) year in the county jail or a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or both.

Each day or part of a day during which the violation is continued or repeated shall constitute a separate offense.

A person who violates this section or the rules issued under this subchapter, or who violates any condition of a permit issued under this subchapter, may be assessed a civil penalty by the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission under administrative procedures and civil penalty rules of the commission.

The civil penalty shall not exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) for each violation.

Each day of a continuing violation may be considered a separate violation for purposes of civil penalty assessments.

However, a civil penalty assessment shall not be assessed until the person charged with the violation has been given the opportunity for a hearing on the violation under §§ 8-4-218, 8-4-219, and 8-4-221.

A person is not liable for violating a provision of this subchapter or of any rule, permit, or order issued under this subchapter if the violation was caused solely by the acts or omissions of a third party.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 1098, § 6; 1985, No. 922, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-4222; Acts 1989, No. 260, § 6; 2015, No. 1264, § 8; 2019, No. 315, §§ 623-625; 2019, No. 910, § 2747.

Amendments.

The 2015 amendment rewrote the introductory language of (a); substituted “Violate” for “To violate any” in (a)(1); in (a)(2), deleted “To” at the beginning and substituted “or” for “and” at the end; deleted “To” at the beginning of (a)(3); inserted (b); redesignated former (b) as (c); and rewrote (c).

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “regulation” following “rule” in (a)(1) and (c); substituted “rule” for “regulations” in (a)(2); and substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (a)(3) and twice in (b)(2)(A).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (a)(2); and substituted “division” for “department” in (a)(3).

8-7-308. Powers and duties generally.

The Division of Environmental Quality shall have the following powers and duties:

To enter into such agreements or compacts between one (1) or more states or with the United States Government as may be necessary and appropriate to effectuate a program consistent with the purposes of this subchapter if these agreements or compacts first receive the approval of the Governor;

To adopt such rules as may be necessary and appropriate to enforce within the state the terms of any interstate agreement or compact developed pursuant to the provisions of this subchapter;

To promote the purposes of this subchapter and to effectuate and implement interstate agreements by imposing reasonable conditions on permits issued under this subchapter and the Arkansas Hazardous Waste Management Act of 1979, § 8-7-201 et seq., and the rules promulgated under this subchapter and the Arkansas Hazardous Waste Management Act of 1979, § 8-7-201 et seq.;

To prohibit, by rule or by condition of permit, the disposal of any hazardous waste within the state unless the owner or custodian of the hazardous waste can demonstrate to the reasonable satisfaction of the Director of the Division of Environmental Quality that it is technically or economically infeasible for the hazardous waste to be treated;

To issue, continue in effect, revoke, modify, or deny, under such terms as the division or the General Assembly may prescribe, permits for the establishment, construction, operation, or maintenance of hazardous waste treatment or disposal facilities;

To adopt and enforce rules which would require the owners, operators, or other responsible parties of inactive or abandoned disposal sites to undertake such actions as are reasonable to prevent environmental contamination;

To receive federal and private funds for the purpose of securing or reclaiming abandoned hazardous waste disposal sites in an environmentally safe manner; and

To encourage and to participate in studies, projects, and agreements for the purpose of identifying and evaluating improvements in hazardous waste treatment and disposal techniques.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 1098, § 5; 1985, No. 922, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-4221; Acts 2019, No. 315, §§ 626, 627; 2019, No. 910, §§ 2748, 2749.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (2), (3), and (6); and substituted “rule” for “regulation” in (4).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in the introductory language and in (4); and substituted “division” for “department” in (5).

8-7-309. Appeals.

Appeal of the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission's decision may be taken in accordance with the appellate procedure specified in §§ 8-4-222 — 8-4-229.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 1098, § 7; 1985, No. 922, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-4223.

Subchapter 4
— Emergency Response Fund Act

8-7-401 — 8-7-421. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This subchapter, concerning the Emergency Response Fund Act, was repealed by Acts 2005, No. 1824, § 4. The subchapter was derived from the following sources:

8-7-401. Acts 1985, No. 452, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-4701.

8-7-402. Acts 1985, No. 452, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-4702.

8-7-403. Acts 1985, No. 452, §§ 3, 7; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 82-4703, 82-4707; Acts 1989, No. 260, § 5; 1999, No. 1164, §§ 95, 96.

8-7-404. Acts 1985, No. 452, § 11; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-4711.

8-7-405. Acts 1985, No. 452, § 10; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-4710.

8-7-406. Acts 1985, No. 452, § 9; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-4709.

8-7-407. Acts 1985, No. 452, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-4707.

8-7-408. Acts 1985, No. 452, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-4705; Acts 1987, No. 761, § 1.

8-7-409. Acts 1985, No. 452, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-4705; Acts 1989, No. 260, § 3.

8-7-410. Acts 1985, No. 452, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-4704; Acts 1997, No. 309, § 3; 1999, No. 140, § 1.

8-7-411. Acts 1985, No. 452, §§ 2, 5; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 82-4702, 82-4705; Acts 1995, No. 114, § 1.

8-7-412. Acts 1985, No. 452, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-4706.

8-7-413. Acts 1985, No. 452, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-4707.

8-7-414. Acts 1985, No. 452, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-4707.

8-7-415. Acts 1985, No. 452, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-4707; Acts 1991, No. 516, § 2; 1999, No. 1164, § 97.

8-7-416. Acts 1985, No. 452, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-4707.

8-7-417. Acts 1985, No. 452, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-4708; Acts 1988 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 15, § 1.

8-7-418. Acts 1985, No. 452, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-4707.

8-7-419. Acts 1985, No. 452, § 9; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-4709.

8-7-420. Acts 1987, No. 761, § 2.

8-7-421. Acts 2001, No. 449, § 1.

Subchapter 5
— Remedial Action Trust Fund Act

Cross References.

Emergency services, § 12-75-101 et seq.

Effective Dates.

Acts 1985, No. 479, § 16: Mar. 21, 1985. Emergency clause provided: “It has been found, and is declared by the General Assembly of Arkansas, that a great need exists to provide funding for state government response to release of hazardous substances into the environment of the state that threaten the public health and welfare. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall take effect and be in force from the date of its approval.”

Acts 1987, No. 380, § 3: Apr. 23, 1987. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the annual fees currently assessed persons who generate hazardous waste in the State or accept hazardous wastes generated outside the State for treatment, storage or disposal in the State are based on weight alone; that a fee based on weight alone does not take into consideration many factors which should be given consideration in determining fair and equitable fees for generating or accepting hazardous wastes in the State for disposal, treatment or storage; that this Act is designed to authorize the Pollution Control and Ecology Commission to set such fees, within a prescribed maximum based on all relevant factors and should be given effect immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1988 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 15, § 4: Feb. 9, 1988. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that FHLMC (Freddie Mac) has indicated that loans in Arkansas may be jeopardized due to lien provisions contained in the Emergency Response Fund Act; that this matter needs immediate clarification in order to insure that monies are available to the people of Arkansas for economic development. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1989, No. 441, § 6: Mar. 9, 1989. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that there are numerous hazardous substance sites in this state which pose a threat to the public health, welfare and safety of the citizens of this state and to the environment. In order to promptly address these sites it is imperative that this act be adopted to encourage maximum participation from the private sector. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1999, No. 1041, § 7: Apr. 1, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly that the laws of this state concerning the assessment of fees for the generation of hazardous waste which is managed in a totally enclosed treatment facility, an elementary neutralization unit, or a wastewater treatment unit are inequitable in that not all such management activities are assessed and the methodology of calculating the volume of waste generated is not uniform. Further, the fees are duplicative of fees assessed by the Water Division for the same activities when an NPDES or UIC Permit has been issued to authorize disposal of such wastes after treatment. Further, the assessment of such fees for activities such as the management in a totally enclosed treatment facility, an elementary neutralization unit, or a wastewater treatment unit can have the effect of discouraging the type of management activities that are proper and acceptable for such wastes. Further, the department will be issuing statements for hazardous waste generation activities in March of 1999 for 1998 hazardous waste activities, and this bill is necessary to avoid the assessment of unnecessary fees for 1998 hazardous waste activities and avoid disruption of the hazardous waste management program. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Act 2005, No. 1824, § 20: July 1, 2005. Emergency clause provided: “The General Assembly of the State of Arkansas hereby finds and determines that the decision of the Arkansas Supreme Court in Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality v. Brighton Corp. 352 Ark. 396, 102 S.W.3d 458 (2003), has raised questions regarding the factual proof required to establish a claim for cost recovery under the Arkansas Remedial Action Trust Fund Act and regarding the retroactivity of the statute. The General Assembly further finds and determines that the doubts raised by the decision in the Brighton case have created substantial uncertainty regarding the enforcement authority of the Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality and the rights and responsibilities of private parties under the Arkansas Remedial Action Trust Fund Act, all of which require urgent resolution. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist; and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2005, and shall apply retroactively.”

Acts 2011, No. 1011, § 8: July 1, 2011. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that lead and lead-based paint have been determined to be a human health concern posing an immediate danger to children, families, and the environment; and that this act is immediately necessary to prevent irreparable harm to children in this state. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2011.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

8-7-501. Title.

This subchapter may be known and may be cited as the “Remedial Action Trust Fund Act”.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 479, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-4712.

8-7-502. Legislative intent — Purposes.

It is the intent of the General Assembly to provide the state with the necessary authority and funds to investigate, control, prevent, abate, treat, or contain releases of hazardous substances necessary to protect the public health and the environment, including funds required to assure payment of the state's participation in response actions pursuant to the Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation, and Liability Act of 1980, Pub. L. No. 96-510, and to encourage the reduction of hazardous waste generation.

The purpose of this subchapter is to encourage privately funded remedial action and to clarify that persons who have undertaken remedial action at a hazardous substance site in response to an action initiated by the Division of Environmental Quality pursuant to § 8-7-508 may obtain contribution from any other person who is liable for remediation of the hazardous substance site.

A further purpose of this subchapter is to clarify the General Assembly's intent to provide the division with the necessary funds for remedial action at a hazardous substance site, recognizing that both public and private funds must be expended to implement remedial action at the hazardous substance sites which exist in this state. Costs and expenses for remedial action, whether expended by the division or by any person liable for the hazardous substance site, are legal damages to persons liable to the state and to persons liable to any other person for contribution, whether the liability arises by voluntary compliance with this subchapter pursuant to an order from or settlement with the division, or by suit for injunctive relief, declaratory judgment, contribution, damages, or restitution, and whether the suit is brought by the state or by any party authorized to bring a suit for relief under this subchapter.

The General Assembly expressly intends that the provisions of this subchapter shall apply retroactively.

A further purpose of this act is to:

Provide the state with the authority necessary to protect the public's health and safety and the environment from releases or threatened releases of hazardous substances;

Provide emergency response capabilities necessary to promptly contain, control, or remove hazardous substances resulting from spills or accidental releases; and

Provide the state with the authority necessary to fund site assessments at any one (1) or more of the following:

Abandoned industrial, commercial, and agricultural sites or residential properties as stated in § 8-7-1101 et seq. for written requests from quasi-governmental agencies, county government, school districts, and planning and development districts if the persons do not hold title at the time of the written requests; or

Potentially contaminated sites when a letter of intent is signed and available federal funds are exhausted.

The provisions concerning site assessments under §§ 8-7-504(a) and (b), 8-7-505, 8-7-508, 8-7-509(e) and (f), and 8-7-516 shall not apply under this subdivision (e)(3).

History.

Acts 1985, No. 479, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-4713; Acts 1989, No. 441, § 1; 2005, No. 1824, § 2; 2017, No. 1073, § 1; 2019, No. 910, § 2750.

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment added (e)(3).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (b); and substituted “division” for “department” throughout (c).

Meaning of “this act”.

Acts 2005, No. 1824, codified as 8-4-103, 8-6-204, 8-7-204, 8-7-402 — 8-7-421 [repealed], §§ 8-7-502, 8-7-503, 8-7-508, 8-7-509, 8-7-512, 8-7-514 — 8-7-517, 8-7-519, 8-7-521, 8-7-525, 19-5-929 [repealed], and 20-27-1002.

U.S. Code.

The Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation, and Liability Act of 1980, referred to in this section, is codified primarily as 42 U.S.C. § 9601 et seq.

8-7-503. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Commission” means the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission;

[Repealed.]

[Repealed.]

“Federal act” means the Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation, and Liability Act of 1980, Pub. L. No. 96-510;

“Fund” means the Hazardous Substance Remedial Action Trust Fund created by this subchapter;

“Hazardous substance” means:

As of March 21, 1985, any:

Substance designated pursuant to § 311(b)(2)(A) of the Federal Water Pollution Control Act, 33 U.S.C. § 1321(b)(2)(A);

Element, compound, mixture, solution, or substance designated pursuant to § 102 of Title I of the Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation, and Liability Act of 1980, 42 U.S.C. § 9602;

Hazardous waste, including polychlorinated biphenyls, as defined by the Arkansas Hazardous Waste Management Act of 1979, § 8-7-201 et seq., and the rules promulgated thereunder;

Toxic pollutant listed under § 307(a) of the Federal Water Pollution Control Act, 33 U.S.C. § 1317(a);

Hazardous air pollutant listed under § 112 of the Clean Air Act, 42 U.S.C. § 7412; and

Hazardous chemical substance or mixture regulated under § 7 of the Toxic Substances Control Act, 15 U.S.C. § 2606; and

Any other substance or pollutant designated by rules of the commission promulgated under this subchapter;

“Hazardous substance sites” means any sites or facilities where hazardous substances have been disposed of or from which there is a release or threatened release of hazardous substances;

“Person” means any individual, corporation, company, firm, partnership, association, trust, joint-stock company or trust, venture, state or federal government or agency, quasi-governmental agency, county government, school district, and planning and development district, or any other legal entity, however organized;

“Releases of hazardous substances” means any spilling, leaking, pouring, emitting, emptying, discharging, injecting, escaping, leaching, dumping, or disposing of hazardous substances into the environment;

“Remedial action” means action necessary to effect permanent control, abatement, prevention, treatment, or containment of releases and threatened releases, including the removal of hazardous substances from the environment when removal is necessary to protect public health and the environment. Such actions are intended to include investigations designed to determine the need for and scope of remedial action and such planning, legal, fiscal, economic, engineering, geological, technical, or architectural studies as necessary to plan and direct remedial actions, to recover the cost thereof, and to enforce the provisions of this subchapter;

“Removal action” means:

The necessary cleanup or removal of a released hazardous substance from the environment;

Necessary actions taken in the event of a threatened release of a hazardous substance into the environment;

Actions necessary to monitor, test, analyze, and evaluate a release or threatened release of a hazardous substance;

Disposal or processing of removed material; or

Other actions necessary to prevent, minimize, or mitigate damage to the public health or welfare or the environment that may otherwise result from a release or threatened release;

“Threatened release” means, for the purpose of this subchapter, any situation in which a sudden or nonsudden release of hazardous substances can be reasonably expected unless prevented by change of operation or installation or construction of containment or treatment devices or by removal action or other remedial action; and

“Treatment”, “storage”, “disposal”, “generation”, and “hazardous waste” mean the same as provided in § 8-7-203 and the rules promulgated pursuant to the Arkansas Hazardous Waste Management Act of 1979, § 8-7-201 et seq.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 479, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-4714; Acts 1995, No. 125, § 2; 1997, No. 1042, § 12(a); 1999, No. 1164, §§ 98, 99; 2005, No. 1824, § 8; 2017, No. 1073, § 2; 2019, No. 315, §§ 628-630; 2019, No. 910, § 2751.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 1995, No. 125, § 1, provided:

“The General Assembly finds and declares as follow:

“(1)

The redevelopment of abandoned industrial sites should be encouraged as a sound land use management policy to prevent the needless development of prime farmland, open space and natural and recreation areas and to prevent urban sprawl;

“(2)

The redevelopment of abandoned industrial sites should be encouraged so that these sites can be returned to useful, tax producing properties to protect existing jobs and provide new job opportunities;

“(3)

Persons interested in redeveloping abandoned industrial sites should have a method of determining what their legal liabilities and cleanup responsibilities will be as they plan the reuse of abandoned sites;

“(4)

Incentives should be put in place to encourage prospective purchasers to voluntarily develop and implement cleanup plans of abandoned industrial sites without the use of taxpayer funds or the need for adversarial enforcement actions by the Arkansas Department of Pollution Control and Ecology;

“(5)

The Arkansas Department of Pollution Control and Ecology now routinely, through its permitting policies, determines when contamination will and will not pose unacceptable risks to public health or the environment and similar concepts are used in establishing cleanup policies for abandoned industrial sites;

“(6)

Parties and persons responsible under law for pollution at industrial sites should perform remedial responses which are fully consistent with existing requirements; and

“(7)

As an incentive to promote the redevelopment of abandoned industrial sites, persons not responsible for preexisting pollution at or contamination on industrial sites should meet alternative cleanup requirements if they acquire title after fully disclosing the nature of conditions at the site and declaring and committing to a specified future land use of the site.”

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment inserted “quasi-governmental agency, county government, school district, and planning and development district” in (8).

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (6)(A)(iii), (6)(B), and (13).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 repealed (2) and (3).

U.S. Code.

The Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation, and Liability Act of 1980, Pub. L. No. 96-510, is codified primarily as 42 U.S.C. § 9601 et seq.

8-7-504. Penalties.

Any person who commits any unlawful act under this subchapter shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be subject to imprisonment for not more than one (1) year or a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or to both a fine and imprisonment.

Each day or part of a day during which such violation is continued or repeated shall constitute a separate offense.

Any person who violates any provision of this subchapter or commits any unlawful act under this subchapter shall be subject to:

A civil penalty in such amount as the Director of the Division of Environmental Quality shall find appropriate, not to exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) per day of the violation;

The payment of any expenses reasonably incurred by the state in removing, correcting, or terminating any adverse effects resulting therefrom, including the cost of the investigation, inspection, or survey establishing the violation or unlawful act; and

The payment to the state of reasonable compensation of any actual damage resulting therefrom.

One-half (½) of the civil penalties provided for in subdivision (b)(1) of this section, but not to exceed five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) in any one (1) calendar year and not to exceed four million dollars ($4,000,000) in the aggregate, may be deposited into the Remedial Action Account in the Construction Assistance Revolving Loan Fund established pursuant to § 15-5-901, if so authorized by the director, and such moneys shall not be deposited into or deemed to be a part of the State Treasury for the purposes of Arkansas Constitution, Article 5, § 29, Arkansas Constitution, Article 16, § 12, Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 20, or any other constitutional or statutory provisions.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 479, § 11; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-4722; Acts 1997, No. 1042, § 3; 2019, No. 910, § 2752.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (b)(1).